Colorado, session 2026A, HB1190.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-103, add (11.7)
and (11.8) as follows:
44-3-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 3 and article 4 of this title 44, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(11.7) "CRAFT PRODUCER" MEANS A MANUFACTURER OF ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES THAT PRODUCES NO MORE THAN THE FOLLOWING AMOUNT OF
THE SPECIFIED ALCOHOL BEVERAGE PER CALENDAR YEAR:
(a) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND GALLONS, WHICH IS APPROXIMATELY
THREE HUNDRED SEVENTY-EIGHT THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED FORTY-ONE
-2- HB26-1190

LITERS, OR LESS OF VINOUS SPIRITS;
(b) TWO HUNDRED FORTY THOUSAND GALLONS, WHICH IS
APPROXIMATELY NINE HUNDRED EIGHT THOUSAND FOUR HUNDRED
NINETY-EIGHT LITERS, OR LESS OF MALT LIQUORS OR HARD CIDER; OR
(c) EIGHT HUNDRED SEVENTY-FIVE THOUSAND LITERS, WHICH IS
APPROXIMATELY TWO HUNDRED THIRTY-ONE THOUSAND GALLONS, OR
LESS OF SPIRITUOUS LIQUORS.
(11.8) "CRAFT PRODUCT" MEANS AN ALCOHOL BEVERAGE
PRODUCED BY A CRAFT PRODUCER.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-422, amend
(1)(a); and add (6) as follows:
44-3-422. Vintner's restaurant license - shipping to winery
club members.
(1) (a) A vintner's restaurant license may be issued to a person
operating a vintner's restaurant and also selling alcohol beverages for
consumption on the premises. SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS
SECTION, A VINTNER'S RESTAURANT MAY SELL AND SHIP VINOUS LIQUORS
DIRECTLY ONLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS JOINED A WINERY CLUB.
(6) (a) A VINTNER'S RESTAURANT LICENSEE MAY CREATE A
WINERY CLUB ASSOCIATED WITH THE VINTNER'S RESTAURANT. TO CREATE
A WINERY CLUB, THE VINTNER'S RESTAURANT LICENSEE MUST OBTAIN AND
RETAIN, FOR AS LONG AS THE CLUB IS ACTIVE AND FOR EACH CURRENT
MEMBER OF THE CLUB, THE MEMBER'S NAME, ADDRESS, AND AGE AND A
RECORD OF HOW THE MEMBER'S AGE WAS VERIFIED.
(b) TO JOIN A WINERY CLUB, AN INDIVIDUAL MUST:
(I) PROVIDE THE VINTNER'S RESTAURANT LICENSEE WITH THE
APPLICANT'S NAME, ADDRESS, AND AGE; AND
-3- HB26-1190

(II) PROVIDE PROOF OF AGE AND IDENTITY.
(c) TO SHIP VINOUS LIQUORS DIRECTLY TO AN ADDRESS, A
VINTNER'S RESTAURANT LICENSEE MUST VERIFY THAT THE INDIVIDUAL
WHO ORDERED THE WINE IS A MEMBER OF THE WINERY CLUB OF THE
VINTNER'S RESTAURANT AND THAT THE DELIVERY ADDRESS IS THE SAME
ADDRESS ON FILE FOR THE CLUB MEMBER.
(d) THIS SUBSECTION (6) DOES NOT AUTHORIZE A VINTNER'S
RESTAURANT LICENSEE TO SHIP VINOUS LIQUORS DIRECTLY TO AN
ADDRESS UNLESS THE VINOUS LIQUORS ARE MANUFACTURED BY A
VINTNER'S RESTAURANT LICENSEE ON THE LICENSED PREMISES.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-402, add (8) as
follows:
44-3-402. Manufacturer's license - sales rooms - expanded
sales room permit - rules.
(8) (a) (I) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE AN
EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT TO A MANUFACTURER LICENSED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. IF A MANUFACTURER OBTAINS AN EXPANDED
SALES ROOM PERMIT PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (8), THE
MANUFACTURER MAY:
(A) OPERATE A RESTAURANT AT THE MANUFACTURER'S SALES
ROOM; OR
(B) SELL OR PROVIDE ALCOHOL BEVERAGES THAT ARE NOT
MANUFACTURED BY THE PERMIT HOLDER BY THE DRINK FOR CONSUMPTION
AT THE SALES ROOM IF THE ALCOHOL BEVERAGE IS A CRAFT PRODUCT.
(II) A MANUFACTURER MUST OBTAIN A SEPARATE EXPANDED
SALES ROOM PERMIT FOR EACH LOCATION WHERE ACTIVITIES THAT ARE
AUTHORIZED BY THIS SUBSECTION (8) OCCUR.
-4- HB26-1190

(III) TO OBTAIN AN EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (8), A MANUFACTURER MUST APPLY TO THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY. THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY DETERMINE BY RULE
THE FORM AND MANNER OF THE PERMIT APPLICATION.
(b) (I) IF THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY APPROVES A
MANUFACTURER'S EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT APPLICATION, THE
MANUFACTURER SHALL:
(A) HAVE SANDWICHES AND LIGHT SNACKS AVAILABLE FOR
CONSUMPTION ON THE PREMISES OF THE SALES ROOM BUT NEED NOT HAVE
MEALS AVAILABLE FOR CONSUMPTION ON THE PREMISES OF THE SALES
ROOM; AND
(B) NOT SELL AT THE SALES ROOM THE ALCOHOL BEVERAGES
AUTHORIZED IN SUBSECTION (8)(a)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION IN AN AMOUNT
IN EXCESS OF FIFTY PERCENT OF THE TOTAL SALES OF ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES.
(II) THE SALES LIMITATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (8)(b)(I) OF
THIS SECTION IS MEASURED BY THE GROSS SALES PRICE OF THE ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES AUTHORIZED IN SUBSECTION (8)(a)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION
AND BY THE GROSS SALES PRICE OF ALL ALCOHOL BEVERAGES SOLD FOR
CONSUMPTION AT THE SALES ROOM.
(c) (I) TO BE ISSUED AN EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT, A COPY
OF A PERMIT APPLICATION FILED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (8) MUST BE
POSTED IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE AT THE LOCATION THAT IS THE SUBJECT
OF THE PERMIT APPLICATION FOR A PERIOD OF THIRTY DAYS, AND MUST BE
PUBLISHED ONCE IN A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION IN THE
COUNTY WITH JURISDICTION OVER THE LOCATION, BEFORE THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY DETERMINES WHETHER TO ISSUE THE PERMIT. THE
-5- HB26-1190

STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL APPROVE OR DENY THE PERMIT
WITHIN NINETY DAYS AFTER THE APPLICATION IS FILED.
(II) AN EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT HOLDER SHALL DISPLAY
THE EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT WITH THE MANUFACTURER'S LICENSE
AT THE LOCATION THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE ISSUED PERMIT.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-403, add (7) as
follows:
44-3-403. Limited winery license - expanded sales room
permit - rules.
(7) (a) (I) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE AN
EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT TO A LIMITED WINERY LICENSEE. IF A
LIMITED WINERY OBTAINS AN EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (7), THE LIMITED WINERY MAY:
(A) OPERATE A RESTAURANT AT THE LIMITED WINERY'S SALES
ROOM; OR
(B) SELL OR PROVIDE ALCOHOL BEVERAGES THAT ARE NOT
MANUFACTURED BY THE PERMIT HOLDER BY THE DRINK FOR CONSUMPTION
AT THE SALES ROOM IF THE ALCOHOL BEVERAGE IS A CRAFT PRODUCT.
(II) A LIMITED WINERY MUST OBTAIN A SEPARATE EXPANDED
SALES ROOM PERMIT FOR EACH LOCATION WHERE ACTIVITIES THAT ARE
AUTHORIZED BY THIS SUBSECTION (7) OCCUR.
(III) TO OBTAIN AN EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (7), A LIMITED WINERY MUST APPLY TO THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY. THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY DETERMINE BY RULE
THE FORM AND MANNER OF THE PERMIT APPLICATION.
(b) (I) IF THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY APPROVES A LIMITED
WINERY'S EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT APPLICATION, THE LIMITED
-6- HB26-1190

WINERY SHALL:
(A) HAVE SANDWICHES AND LIGHT SNACKS AVAILABLE FOR
CONSUMPTION ON THE PREMISES OF THE SALES ROOM BUT NEED NOT HAVE
MEALS AVAILABLE FOR CONSUMPTION ON THE PREMISES OF THE SALES
ROOM; AND
(B) NOT SELL AT THE SALES ROOM THE ALCOHOL BEVERAGES
AUTHORIZED IN SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION IN AN AMOUNT
IN EXCESS OF FIFTY PERCENT OF THE TOTAL SALES OF ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES.
(II) THE SALES LIMITATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (7)(b)(I) OF
THIS SECTION IS MEASURED BY THE GROSS SALES PRICE OF THE ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES AUTHORIZED IN SUBSECTION (7)(a)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION
AND BY THE GROSS SALES PRICE OF ALL ALCOHOL BEVERAGES SOLD FOR
CONSUMPTION AT THE SALES ROOM.
(c) (I) TO BE ISSUED AN EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT, A COPY
OF A PERMIT APPLICATION FILED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (7) MUST BE
POSTED IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE AT THE LOCATION THAT IS THE SUBJECT
OF THE PERMIT APPLICATION FOR A PERIOD OF THIRTY DAYS, AND MUST BE
PUBLISHED ONCE IN A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION IN THE
COUNTY WITH JURISDICTION OVER THE LOCATION, BEFORE THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY DETERMINES WHETHER TO ISSUE THE PERMIT. THE
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL APPROVE OR DENY THE PERMIT
WITHIN NINETY DAYS AFTER THE APPLICATION IS FILED.
(II) AN EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT HOLDER SHALL DISPLAY
THE EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT WITH THE LIMITED WINERY'S LICENSE
AT THE LOCATION THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE ISSUED PERMIT.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-407, add (5) as
-7- HB26-1190

follows:
44-3-407. Wholesaler's license - discrimination in wholesale
sales prohibited - expanded sales room permit - rules.
(5) (a) (I) THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY MAY ISSUE AN
EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT TO A WHOLESALER'S LIQUOR LICENSEE
THAT MANUFACTURES MALT LIQUORS. IF A WHOLESALER THAT
MANUFACTURES MALT LIQUORS OBTAINS AN EXPANDED SALES ROOM
PERMIT PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5), THE WHOLESALER MAY:
(A) OPERATE A RESTAURANT AT THE WHOLESALER'S SALES ROOM;
OR
(B) SELL OR PROVIDE ALCOHOL BEVERAGES THAT ARE NOT
MANUFACTURED BY THE PERMIT HOLDER BY THE DRINK FOR CONSUMPTION
AT THE SALES ROOM IF THE ALCOHOL BEVERAGE IS A CRAFT PRODUCT.
(II) A WHOLESALER THAT MANUFACTURES MALT LIQUORS MUST
OBTAIN A SEPARATE EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT FOR EACH LOCATION
WHERE ACTIVITIES THAT ARE AUTHORIZED BY THIS SUBSECTION (5)
OCCUR.
(III) TO OBTAIN AN EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION (5), A WHOLESALER THAT MANUFACTURES MALT LIQUORS
MUST APPLY TO THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY. THE STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITY MAY DETERMINE BY RULE THE FORM AND MANNER OF THE
PERMIT APPLICATION.
(b) (I) IF THE STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY APPROVES AN
EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT APPLICATION OF A WHOLESALER THAT
MANUFACTURES MALT LIQUORS, THE WHOLESALER SHALL:
(A) HAVE SANDWICHES AND LIGHT SNACKS AVAILABLE FOR
CONSUMPTION ON THE PREMISES OF THE SALES ROOM BUT NEED NOT HAVE
-8- HB26-1190

MEALS AVAILABLE FOR CONSUMPTION ON THE PREMISES OF THE SALES
ROOM; AND
(B) NOT SELL AT THE SALES ROOM THE ALCOHOL BEVERAGES
AUTHORIZED IN SUBSECTION (5)(a)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION IN AN AMOUNT
IN EXCESS OF FIFTY PERCENT OF THE TOTAL SALES OF ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES.
(II) THE SALES LIMITATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (5)(b)(I) OF
THIS SECTION IS MEASURED BY THE GROSS SALES PRICE OF THE ALCOHOL
BEVERAGES AUTHORIZED IN SUBSECTION (5)(a)(I)(B) OF THIS SECTION
AND BY THE GROSS SALES PRICE OF ALL ALCOHOL BEVERAGES SOLD FOR
CONSUMPTION AT THE SALES ROOM.
(c) (I) TO BE ISSUED AN EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT, A COPY
OF A PERMIT APPLICATION FILED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (5) MUST BE
POSTED IN A CONSPICUOUS PLACE AT THE LOCATION THAT IS THE SUBJECT
OF THE PERMIT APPLICATION FOR A PERIOD OF THIRTY DAYS, AND MUST BE
PUBLISHED ONCE IN A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION IN THE
COUNTY WITH JURISDICTION OVER THE LOCATION, BEFORE THE STATE
LICENSING AUTHORITY DETERMINES WHETHER TO ISSUE THE PERMIT. THE
STATE LICENSING AUTHORITY SHALL APPROVE OR DENY THE PERMIT
WITHIN NINETY DAYS AFTER THE APPLICATION IS FILED.
(II) AN EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT HOLDER SHALL DISPLAY
THE EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT WITH THE LICENSE OF THE
WHOLESALER THAT MANUFACTURES MALT LIQUORS AT THE LOCATION
THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF THE ISSUED PERMIT.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-426, amend
(1)(f) and (3)(d) as follows:
44-3-426. Distillery pub license - legislative declaration -
-9- HB26-1190

definition.
(1) The general assembly finds and determines that:
(f) While a distillery pub is allowed to produce, serve, and
distribute its own spirituous liquors, unlike a licensed spirits
manufacturer, the production level for a distillery pub is capped, and the
ability to distribute to retail outlets is greatly restricted, thereby
establishing a new business model that is distinct from, and serves a
different clientele than, a licensed spirits manufacturer;
(3) During the hours established in section 44-3-901 (6)(b), a
licensed distillery pub may, with regard to spirituous liquors fermented
and distilled by the distillery pub licensee on the licensed premises:
(d) Sell its spirituous liquors at wholesale to licensed retailers in
an amount up to two EIGHT thousand seven ONE hundred liters per
spirituous liquor product per calendar year.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 44-3-501, amend
(3)(a)(XXII) and (3)(a)(XXIII); and add (3)(a)(XXIV) as follows:
44-3-501. State fees - rules.
(3) (a) The state licensing authority shall establish fees for
processing the following types of applications, notices, or reports required
to be submitted to the state licensing authority:
(XXII) Applications for each noncontiguous manufacturing
facility pursuant to section 44-3-402 and rules adopted pursuant to that
section; and
(XXIII) Applications for an alcohol beverage shipper license
pursuant to section 44-3-430 and rules adopted pursuant to that section;
AND
(XXIV) APPLICATIONS FOR THE EXPANDED SALES ROOM PERMIT
-10- HB26-1190

ISSUED UNDER SECTION 44-3-402 (8), 44-3-403 (7), OR 44-3-407 (5).
SECTION 8. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-11- HB26-1190